Vermont statutes. Title 11B Nonprofit Corporations
Subchapter 1. Admission of Members

§ 6.01.
Admission.

A corporation may admit any person as a member. The articles or bylaws may establish criteria or procedures for admission.

No person shall be admitted as a member without his or her consent.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.02.
Consideration.

Except as provided in its articles or bylaws, a corporation may admit members for no consideration or for such consideration as is determined by the board.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.

§ 6.03.
No requirement of members.

A corporation is not required to have members.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1997.